District of Columbia statutes.
16-3105

Plenary proceeding; refusal to answer as required.

When either of the parties having a contest in the Probate Court requires, the court may direct a plenary proceeding, by bill or petition, to which there shall be an answer, on oath or affirmation. If the party, refuses to answer on oath or affirmation, as the case may require, to any matter alleged in the bill or petition, and proper for the court to decide upon, the court may exercise its contempt power, or it may have his property attached and sequestered as provided by section 16-3104 .

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 599, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 561, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(l)(2)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-3106.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-3105.
1973 Ed., § 16-3105.